Nebraska, session 109, LB286.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-12,110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,110 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
private nonprofit corporation or an inland port authority created under the
Municipal Inland Port Authority Act may apply to the director to become
designated as an iHub. The director shall accept applications filed under this
section through December 31, 2025. The application shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) A statement of purpose;
(b) A signed statement of cooperation and a description of the roles and
relationships of each iHub partner;
(c) A clear explanation and map conveying the iHub area;
(d) A clearly identified central location for the iHub, which shall be a
physical location;
(e) A complete budget, including a description of secured funds, pending
funds, and potential future funding sources;
(f) A clearly articulated iHub management structure and plan, which may
include a description of the capabilities, qualifications, and experience of
the proposed management team, team leaders, or key personnel who are critical
to achieving the proposed objectives;
(g) A list of iHub assets and resources;
(h) A clearly articulated industry focus area of the iHub, including
industry sectors or other targeted areas for development and growth;
(i) A list of specific resources available to support and guide startup
companies;
(j) A five-year plan, which shall include a clearly articulated list of
goals to be achieved with the designation of the iHub;
(k) Defined performance standards agreed upon by the applicant and the
proposed iHub partners, which may include expectations for job development and
business creation;
(l) Evaluation procedures that will be used to measure the level of
achievement for each stated goal;
(m) A plan for sustainability;
(n) Demonstrated experience with innovation programs, such as involvement
with technology commercialization;
(o) Evidence of community engagement and support; and
(p) An application fee of one thousand dollars. The director shall remit
all application fees received under this section to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Innovation Hub Cash Fund.
(2) The department shall establish a weighted scoring system to evaluate
applications for iHub designations with priority given to start-up nonprofits
and inland port authorities expressing new and innovative ideas. Such weighted
scoring system shall consider, at a minimum:
(a) Whether the iHub is committed to serving underrepresented communities
in the proposed iHub area;
(b) Whether the iHub has a plan for marketing and outreach to
underrepresented communities in the proposed iHub area;
(c) Whether the iHub has signed statements of cooperation with at least
three proposed iHub partners; and
(d) The quality of the iHub's five-year plan.
(3) The director shall determine whether or not to approve the requested
iHub designation within forty-five days after receiving the application. Each
iHub designation shall be for a term of five years. An applicant that has
received a grant under subdivision (4)(a) of section 81-12,241 shall not
qualify for designation as an iHub.
(4) The iHub designation shall not be official until a memorandum of
understanding is entered into by the applicant and the director. The memorandum
of understanding shall include the goals and performance standards identified
in the application and other related requirements as determined by the
director.
(5) An iHub area may overlap with another iHub area if there is a clear
distinction between the industry focus areas of the iHubs involved, except that
no iHub located within a city of the metropolitan class shall be located within
three miles of another iHub. This subsection does not apply to any inland port
authority designated as an iHub.
-1-

LB286 LB286
2025 2025
(6) The department shall set guidelines for approval, designation,
operation, and reporting of iHubs.
(7) An iHub shall annually report to the director on its progress in
meeting the goals and performance standards as described in the iHub
application and the implementing memorandum of understanding with the director.
A copy of the report shall also be submitted electronically to the chairperson
of the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature. The report shall also
include information regarding the number of businesses served, the number of
jobs created, and the amount of funds raised by the iHub. The director shall
annually post the information from these reports on the department's website
and provide notice to the Governor and the Legislature that the information is
available on the website.
Sec. 2. Section 81-12,208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,208 (1) In order to be eligible to receive the matching funds
allowed in the Nebraska Rural Projects Act, the applicant shall file an
application with the director, on a form developed by the director, requesting
an agreement.
(2) The application shall:
(a) Identify the project, including the qualified location of such
project;
(b) State the estimated, projected amount of total new investment at the
project, including the estimated, projected amount of applicant resources;
(c) State the E-Verify number or numbers that will be used by the
applicant for employees at the qualified location as provided by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services; and
(d) Contain a nonrefundable application fee of one thousand dollars. The
director shall collect all application fees and shall remit the fees to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Rural Projects Fund.
(3) An application must be complete to establish the date of application.
An application shall be considered complete once it contains the items listed
in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Once satisfied that the application is complete and that the applicant
is eligible to receive the matching funds allowed in the Nebraska Rural
Projects Act, the director shall approve the application.
(5) There shall be no new applications filed under this section after
December 31, 2025 June 30, 2023. Any complete application filed on or before
December 31, 2025 June 30, 2023, shall be considered by the director and
approved if the location and applicant qualify for approval. Agreements may be
executed with regard to any complete application filed on or before December
31, 2025 June 30, 2023.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-12,110 and 81-12,208, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-